Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-412
Arrest under a warrant; prisoner to be taken before magistrate; return.

Whenever any person has been arrested under a warrant as provided in sections 29-401 to 29-411, it shall be the duty of the officer making the arrest to take the person so arrested before the proper magistrate; and the warrant by virtue of which the arrest was made, with the proper return endorsed thereon and signed by the officer, shall be delivered to such magistrate.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 294, p. 791;

R.S.1913, § 8948;

C.S.1922, § 9972;

C.S.1929, § 29-412;

R.S.1943, § 29-412.